Wyoming, session 2025, SF0177.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-227 is created to read:

9-4-227. Residential property tax reduction account.
SF0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0655

The residential property tax reduction account is created.
Funds within the account are continuously appropriated to
the department of revenue for purposes as defined in W.S.
39-13-109(c)(vii). All funds within the account shall be
invested by the state treasurer in accordance with law and
all investment earnings from the account shall be credited
to the account.

Section 2. W.S. 9-2-1012 by creating a new subsection
(j), 9-4-719(q)(i) and 39-13-109(c) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) are amended to read:

9-2-1012. Duties of the department; transmittal of
standard budget and manual; return of completed exception
and expanded budgets; submission to governor; disposition
of excess general fund appropriations; submission of
selected budget information to joint appropriations
committee.

(j) Subject to accrual accounting principles and
prior to the determination of general fund appropriations
for the biennium in excess of expenditures including
SF0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0655
encumbrances during the biennium as identified by the state
auditor under subsection (e) of this section, any
unappropriated funds in the budget reserve account on June
30 of each even numbered year in excess of five percent
(5%) of estimated general fund receipts for the immediately
succeeding biennial budget period shall be transferred to
the residential property tax reduction account created by
W.S. 9-4-227.

9-4-719. Investment earnings spending policy
permanent funds.

(q) The earnings from the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund under W.S. 9-4-204(u)(iii) during each fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2016, which are less than the
spending policy established in subsection (d) of this
section are appropriated from the general fund subject to
subsection (s) of this section and the following:

(i) Any earnings in excess of two and one-half
percent (2.5%) of the previous five (5) year average market
value of the trust fund, calculated from the first day of
the fiscal year and less than or equal to the spending
SF0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0655
policy amount specified in subsection (d) of this section
shall, until June 30, 2026, be credited to the legislative
stabilization reserve residential property tax reduction
account created by W.S. 9-4-219 9-4-227 and the strategic
investments and projects account created by W.S. 9-4-220 in
equal amounts and beginning July 1, 2026 shall be credited
entirely to the residential property tax reduction account
created by W.S. 9-4-227;

39-13-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(c) Refunds. The following shall apply:

(vii) The following shall apply to the surplus
reform residential property tax refund program, which is
hereby created:

(A) On or before the second Monday in
November, the department shall provide a property tax
refund to owners of residential property for their primary
residence as provided in this paragraph. Each owner shall
apply to the department for the refund in a manner and on a
form required by the department;
SF0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0655

(B) Subject to subparagraph (C) of this
paragraph, the amount of the refund shall be the amount of
property taxes paid by the owner on their primary residence
in the preceding calendar year, not to exceed thirteen
thousand three hundred dollars ($13,300.00) of property
taxes paid;

(C) Refunds shall be paid from funds
available in the residential property tax reduction account
created by W.S. 9-4-227. For even numbered years, refunds
shall be capped at one-half (1/2) of the total account
balance. For odd numbered years, refunds shall be capped at
the total balance of the account. If amounts in the account
that are available to provide refunds as provided in this
subparagraph are insufficient to provide full refunds to
each owner of residential property under subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph, refunds shall be proportionally reduced
based on the total amount of refunds due and the total
amount available to be expended from the residential
property tax reduction account;

(D) As used in this paragraph:
SF0177

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0655

(I) "Primary residence" means
residential property where the person claiming the refund
actually resided for not less than six (6) months of the
applicable tax year;

(II) "Residential property" means real
property improved by a dwelling designed to house not more
than four (4) families and includes associated residential
land up to thirty-five (35) acres where the dwelling is
located if the land is owned by the owner of the dwelling.

Section 3. The surplus reform residential property
tax refund program as created by section 2 of this act
shall first apply in tax year 2026 to provide refunds for
property taxes paid for tax year 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0177